Utah statutes.
63G-3-701.   Utah Administrative Code as official compilation of rules -- Judicial notice.

The code shall be received by all the judges, public officers, commissions, and departments of the state government as evidence of the administrative law of the state of Utah and as an authorized compilation of the administrative law of Utah.  All courts shall take judicial notice of the code and its provisions.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

